District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.65

Falsifying documents and testimony.

It shall be unlawful to willfully falsify documents, records, or reports, which are required or subpoenaed pursuant to this chapter, or willfully to falsify testimony, or to intimidate any witness or complainant; such violations shall be punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 days, or by a fine of not more than $300, or by both.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 265, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2529.
1973 Ed., § 6-2275.